Washington statutes.
RCW 43.30.565

Transfer of ownership of department-owned vessel—Review of vessel's physical condition.

(1) Prior to transferring ownership of a department-owned vessel, the department shall conduct a thorough review of the physical condition of the vessel, the vessel's operating capability, and any containers and other materials that are not fixed to the vessel.

(2) If the department determines that the vessel is in a state of advanced deterioration or poses a reasonably imminent threat to human health or safety, including a threat of environmental contamination, the department may: (a) Not transfer the vessel until the conditions identified under this subsection have been corrected; or (b) permanently dispose of the vessel by landfill, deconstruction, or other related method.

(3) Vessels taken into custody under chapter 79.100 RCW are not subject to this section or RCW 43.30.570.

[ 2013 c 291 s 7.]